South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5523.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-9-130.  (A) For purposes of this section, "mobile food unit" means a fully enclosed mobile kitchen that may prepare, cook, or serve food. (B) Any organized fire department in this State may inspect a mobile food unit for compliance with relevant fire code requirements. The certification from an organized fire department in this State is sufficient to satisfy inspection requirements to operate throughout this State. (C) Mobile food units must be inspected annually to ensure compliance with relevant fire code requirements. (D) The State Fire Marshall must develop a certificate to demonstrate compliance with the inspection provision in subsection (B). The certificate must include space for an organized fire department to indicate the date of inspection and the name of the organized fire department that conducted the inspection. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----